Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.450

Right of entry in course of duty by representatives of department.

Any authorized assistants, employees, agents, appointees, or representatives of the department may, in the course of their inspection and enforcement duties as provided for in chapters 76.04, 76.06, 76.09, and 76.36 RCW, enter upon any lands, real estate, waters, or premises except the dwelling house or appurtenant buildings in this state whether public or private and remain thereon while performing such duties. Similar entry by the department may be made for the purpose of making examinations, locations, surveys, and/or appraisals of all lands under the management and jurisdiction of the department; or for making examinations, appraisals and, after five days' written notice to the landowner, making surveys for the purpose of possible acquisition of property to provide public access to public lands. In no event other than an emergency such as firefighting shall motor vehicles be used to cross a field customarily cultivated, without prior consent of the owner. None of the entries herein provided for shall constitute trespass, but nothing contained herein shall limit or diminish any liability which would otherwise exist as a result of the acts or omissions of the department or its representatives.

[ 2003 c 334 s 204; 2000 c 11 s 1; 1983 c 3 s 194; 1971 ex.s. c 49 s 1; 1963 c 100 s 1. Formerly RCW 76.01.060.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.